Arkansas, session 2025, SB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-11-205, concerning the Secretary of the
Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) The department may enter into contracts with department
employees for the provision of golf lessons at the department's golf courses
if the:
(A) Lessons Golf lessons occur outside of the employee's
normal working hours;
(B) Employee is a Class A member or an apprentice of the
Professional Golfers' Association of America or the Ladies Professional Golf
Association; and
(C) Director of the State Parks Division has approved the
contract as being in accordance with department standards and procedures for
concession and operating contracts.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-11-503(4), concerning definitions under
*CEB002*
01/31/2025 10:49:09 AM CEB002

SB176
the Arkansas Tourism Development Act, is amended to read as follows to add
clarifying language:
(4) “Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability
company, partnership, registered limited liability partnership, sole
proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity that invests:
(A) A minimum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000)
in a high-unemployment county or one million dollars ($1,000,000) in any
other county for the purpose of constructing, operating, or intending to
operate a tourism attraction project, whether owned or leased, within the
state that meets the standards promulgated by the director pursuant to § 15-
11-504; or
(B) For the purpose of constructing, operating, or
intending to operate a tourism attraction project, whether owned or leased,
located in a Natural State Initiative Opportunity Zone that meets the
standards promulgated under §§ 15-11-504 and 15-11-512:
(i) A minimum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) in a high-unemployment county; or
(ii) Five A minimum of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) in any other county;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 15-11-804(a), concerning selections for the
Arkansas Great Places Program, is amended to read as follows to repeal
obsolete language and update references:
(a)(1)(A) The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall select
four (4) eligible organizations for participation in the Arkansas Great
Places Program by July 1, 2012.
(B) An eligible organization selected for participation in
the program under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall participate in
the program for a two-year period.
(C) The department shall select an eligible organization
under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section from each of the four (4)
congressional districts.
(D) Two (2) of the four (4) eligible organizations
selected under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section shall be located in
counties of twenty thousand (20,000) residents or fewer.
(2)(A) After July 1, 2012, the department The Department of
01/31/2025 10:49:09 AM CEB002

SB176
Parks, Heritage, and Tourism shall select by July 1 of each even-numbered
year no more than four (4) eligible organizations for participation in the
program Arkansas Great Places Program.
(B)(2) An eligible organization selected for participation
in the program under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(a)(1) of this section shall
participate in the program for a two-year period.

SECTION 4. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.












01/31/2025 10:49:09 AM CEB002